Washington statutes.
RCW 18.160.080

Actions against certificates or licenses—Grounds—Appeal.

(1) The state director of fire protection may refuse to issue or renew or may suspend or revoke the privilege of a licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractor or the certificate of a certificate of competency holder to engage in the fire protection sprinkler system business or in lieu thereof, establish penalties as prescribed by Washington state law, for any of the following reasons:

(a) Gross incompetency or gross negligence in the preparation of technical drawings, installation, repair, alteration, maintenance, inspection, service, or addition to fire protection sprinkler systems;

(b) Except as provided in RCW 9.97.020, conviction of a felony;

(c) Fraudulent or dishonest practices while engaging in the fire protection sprinkler system business;

(d) Use of false evidence or misrepresentation in an application for a license or certificate of competency;

(e) Permitting his or her license to be used in connection with the preparation of any technical drawings which have not been prepared by him or her personally or under his or her immediate supervision, or in violation of this chapter; or

(f) Knowingly violating any provisions of this chapter or the regulations issued thereunder.

(2) The state director of fire protection shall revoke the license of a licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractor or the certificate of a certificate of competency holder who engages in the fire protection sprinkler system business while the license or certificate of competency is suspended.

(3) The state director of fire protection shall immediately suspend any license or certificate issued under this chapter if the holder has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order or a *residential or visitation order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for issuance or reinstatement during the suspension, issuance or reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the director's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

(4) Any licensee or certificate of competency holder who is aggrieved by an order of the state director of fire protection suspending or revoking a license may, within thirty days after notice of such suspension or revocation, appeal under chapter 34.05 RCW. This subsection does not apply to actions taken under subsection (3) of this section.

[ 2016 c 81 s 17; 1997 c 58 s 834; 1990 c 177 s 10.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 1997 c 58 s 886 requiring a court to order certification of noncompliance with residential provisions of a court-ordered parenting plan was vetoed. Provisions ordering the department of social and health services to certify a responsible parent based on a court order to certify for noncompliance with residential provisions of a parenting plan were vetoed. See RCW 74.20A.320.

Finding—Conflict with federal requirements—2016 c 81: See notes following RCW 9.97.010.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.